Georgia statutes. TITLE 1 General Provisions
CHAPTER 4 Holidays and Observances

Cross references.

Designation of Retired Teachers’ Day, §

20-1-6

.

Editor’s notes.

By resolution (see Ga. L. 1982, p. 1317), the General Assembly declared its support for the establishment of the third week of November every year as “Georgia Motor Vehicle Safety Week.”

By resolution (see Ga. L. 1982, p. 1319), the General Assembly designated the second Saturday in May of each year as “Armadillo Olympics Day” in Georgia.

By resolution (Ga. L. 1984, p. 1277), the General Assembly designated 1984 as “The Year of the Disabled Voter in Georgia.”

By resolution (Ga. L. 1985, p. 256), the General Assembly designated the week beginning with the first Sunday of June each year as “Garden Week.”

By resolution (Ga. L. 1990, p. 1732), the General Assembly created the Georgia 1992 Commission, to be abolished December 31, 1992.

1-4-1.
Public and legal holidays; leave for observance of religious holidays not specifically provided for.

The State of Georgia shall recognize and observe as public and legal holidays:

All days which have been designated as of January 1, 2022, as public and legal holidays by the federal government; and

All other days designated and proclaimed by the Governor as public and legal holidays or as days of fasting and prayer or other religious observance. In such designation, the Governor shall include at least one of the following dates: January 19, April 26, or June 3, or a suitable date in lieu thereof to commemorate the event or events now observed by such dates.

The Governor shall close all state offices and facilities a minimum of 13 days throughout the year and not more than 13 days in observance of the public and legal holidays and other days set forth in subsection (a) of this Code section and shall specify the days state offices and facilities shall be closed for such observances.

Employees of any state department or agency shall, upon request to their appointing authority or his or her designee at least seven days in advance, be given priority consideration for time away from work for observance of religious holy days not otherwise provided for in this Code section. Any paid leave time for such religious holy day observance shall be charged to accrued compensatory leave or accrued annual leave credits available to the employee at the time of the holy day observance. No employee may claim priority consideration for more than three work days each calendar year. A request by an employee for time away from work to observe a religious holy day shall not be denied unless the employee has inadequate accrued compensatory or annual leave credits to cover such period of absence or the duties performed by the employee are urgently required and the employee is the only person available who can perform the duties as determined by the appointing authority or his or her designee. The State Personnel Board shall provide by rule and regulation a procedure to be followed by agencies and departments in the granting of such holy days.

History.

Laws 1850, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 522; Code 1863, § 2733; Code 1868, § 2741; Ga. L. 1870, p. 69, § 1; Ga. L. 1871-72, p. 23, § 1; Code 1873, § 2783; Ga. L. 1874, p. 19, § 1; Code 1882, § 2783; Ga. L. 1889, p. 72, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1893, p. 115, § 1; Ga. L. 1894, p. 47, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 3692; Ga. L. 1897, p. 119, § 1; Civil Code 1910, § 4284; Ga. L. 1929, p. 211, § 1; Code 1933, § 14-1808; Ga. L. 1935, p. 350, § 1; Ga. L. 1943, p. 331, § 1; Ga. L. 1945, p. 123, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 986, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 9, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 363, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 368, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 986, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1274, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 745, § 1/SB 97; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 2-1/HB 642; Ga. L. 2016, p. 864, § 1/HB 737; Ga. L. 2022, p. 73, § 1/HB 1335.

The 2022 amendment,

effective April 4, 2022, substituted “January 1, 2022” for “January 1, 1984” in paragraph (a)(1); and substituted “13 days” for “12 days” twice in subsection (b).

Cross references.

Distribution of federal funds; combined purchase of supplies and equipment; minimum school year; summer school programs; year-round operation, §

20-2-168

.

Place and time for holding probate court, §

15-9-82

.

State Merit System of Personnel Administration, T. 45, C. 20.

Editor’s notes.

As of January 1, 1984, the days which have been “designated” as public and legal holidays by the federal government (see

5 U.S.C. § 6103(a)

, as amended by P.L. 98-144) are as follows: New Year’s Day; Birthday of Martin Luther King, Jr.; Washington’s Birthday; Memorial Day; Independence Day; Labor Day; Columbus Day; Veterans’ Day; Thanksgiving Day; and Christmas Day. See subsection (b) of this Code section for powers of Governor to specify the days state offices and facilities shall be closed for observance of public and legal holidays.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

1-4-2.
Religious holidays.

The only days to be declared, treated, and considered as religious holidays shall be the first day of each week, called Sunday.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 331, § 2.

Cross references.

Requirement that businesses and industries operating on either Saturday or Sunday accommodate religious, social, and physical needs of employees on those days, §

10-1-573

.

Prohibition against requiring inmates to do nonessential work on Sunday, §

42-5-40

.

1-4-3.
Designation of “American History Month”.

The State of Georgia recognizes the importance to the citizens of this state of the principles upon which the United States of America was founded and of an understanding of the history of our nation. To encourage the study of American history by the citizens of this state, the month of February of each year is designated as “American History Month” in Georgia. The citizens of this state are encouraged to observe “American History Month” with appropriate observances and programs.

The month of February of each year is also designated as Georgia History Month in special tribute to the founders, builders, and preservers of this state.

History.

Ga. L. 1963, p. 386, § 1; Ga. L. 1974, p. 329, § 1.

1-4-4.
Declaration of “Wildflower Week”.

The fourth week in the month of March of each year is declared to be “Wildflower Week” in Georgia.

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 1849.

1-4-5.
Declaration of “Bird Day”.

The second Thursday in October of each year is declared to be “Bird Day” in Georgia.

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 1849.

1-4-6.
Declaration of “Law Enforcement Officer Appreciation Day”.

The second Monday in February of each year is declared to be “Law Enforcement Officer Appreciation Day” in Georgia.

History.

Code 1981, §

1-4-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 658, § 1.

1-4-7.
Declaration of “Peace Officer Memorial Day”; declaration of “Police Week”.

May 15 of each year is declared to be “Peace Officer Memorial Day” and the calendar week in which it falls is declared as “Police Week.”

History.

Code 1981, §

1-4-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 869, § 1.

1-4-8.
Declaration of “Children’s Day”.

The first Sunday in October of each year, beginning in 1990, is declared to be “Children’s Day” in Georgia.

History.

Code 1981, §

1-4-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 175, § 1.

1-4-9.
Designation of “Former Prisoners of War Recognition Day”.

The day of April 9 of each year is designated as “Former Prisoners of War Recognition Day” in Georgia.

History.

Code 1981, §

1-4-9

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1061, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1990, this Code Section enacted as Code Section 1-4-8 was redesignated as Code Section 1-4-9.

1-4-10.
Designation of “Girls and Women in Sports Day”.

The first Thursday in February of each year is designated as “Girls and Women in Sports Day” in Georgia.

History.

Code 1981, §

1-4-10

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 788, § 1.

1-4-11.
Designation of “Clean Water Week”.

The third week in October of each year is designated and shall be observed as “Clean Water Week” in Georgia.

History.

Code 1981, §

1-4-11

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 1403, § 1.

1-4-12.
Designation of “Firefighter Appreciation Day”.

The first Tuesday in February of each year is designated as “Firefighter Appreciation Day” in Georgia.

History.

Code 1981, §

1-4-12

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 836, § 1.

1-4-13.
Designation of “Bill of Rights Day”.

The State of Georgia recognizes the first ten amendments to the Constitution of the United States as vitally important in articulating and ensuring fundamental human rights. These first ten amendments, known collectively as the Bill of Rights, were ratified on December 15, 1791.

To affirm the fundamental freedoms embodied in the Bill of Rights, celebrate the anniversary of ratification, and commemorate the sacrifices made to preserve these essential rights, December 15 of each year is designated “Bill of Rights Day” in Georgia. The citizens of this state are encouraged to observe the day by reflecting upon the meaning and importance of the Bill of Rights.

History.

Code 1981, §

1-4-13

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 743, § 1.

Cross references.

Bill of Rights, see the Amendments to the U.S. Constitution.

Code Commission notes.

Both Ga. L. 1998, p. 743, § 1 and Ga. L. 1998, p. 1014, § 1 enacted Code Section 1-4-13.
Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1998, Code Section 1-4-13 as enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1014, § 1 was redesignated as Code Section 1-4-14.

1-4-14.
Declaration of “Home Education Week”.

The first week in February of each year is declared to be “Home Education Week” in Georgia.

History.

Code 1981, §

1-4-14

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1014, § 1.

Cross references.

School attendance and home study programs, §

20-2-690

et seq.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1998, this Code section, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1014 as Code Section 1-4-13, was redesignated as Code Section 1-4-14.

1-4-15.
Designation of “Bill Elliott Day.”

The General Assembly finds that a Georgia family’s proud tradition of racing began in Dawsonville, Georgia, under the tutelage and guiding hand of George Elliott. George’s young son Bill began to demonstrate at an early age a natural skill and competitive racing instinct at Dixie Speedway in Woodstock, and in 1976, at the tender age of 20, Bill Elliott entered his first Winston Cup race and launched a career that would span decades. Awesome Bill from Dawsonville, a modest, unassuming, and unpretentious man, has become a household name in NASCAR racing and has been selected Most Popular Driver an unprecedented 16 times, Georgia Professional Athlete of the Year twice, National Motorsports Driver of the Year 14 times, and in 1998, was inducted into the Georgia Sports Hall of Fame. It is virtually impossible to list all of the honors and awards Million Dollar Bill has garnered over his incandescent career, but perhaps his most acclaimed accomplishment is his support, love, and respect from racing fans. He has given unstintingly of his time, talents, energy, and financial resources to numerous charities including the Special Olympics, the M.D. Anderson Cancer Center, and the Make-A-Wish Foundation and it is abundantly fitting and proper that this extraordinary Georgian be recognized in a special and lasting manner.

The members of the General Assembly commend Bill Elliott for his over 30 years of outstanding contributions to the sport of racing and designate October 8 of each year as “Bill Elliott Day” in Georgia.

History.

Code 1981, §

1-4-15

, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 1159, § .1/SB 168; Ga. L. 2006, p. 72, § 1/SB 465.

1-4-15.1.
Designation of “Ronald Reagan Day.”

The General Assembly recognizes that:

President Ronald Wilson Reagan, a man of humble background, worked throughout his life serving freedom and advancing the public good, having been employed as an entertainer, Union leader, corporate spokesman, Governor of California, and President of the United States;

Ronald Reagan served with honor and distinction for two terms as the fortieth President of the United States of America, and in his reelection he earned the confidence of three-fifths of the electorate and was victorious in 49 of the 50 states in the general election, a record unsurpassed in the history of American presidential elections;

During Mr. Reagan’s presidency he worked in a bipartisan manner to enact his bold agenda of restoring accountability and common sense to government which led to an unprecedented economic expansion and opportunity for millions of Americans;

Mr. Reagan’s commitment to an active social policy agenda for the nation’s children helped lower crime rates and drug use in our neighborhoods;

President Reagan’s commitment to our armed forces contributed to the restoration of pride in America, her values and those cherished by the free world, and prepared America’s armed forces to meet twenty-first century challenges;

President Reagan’s vision of “peace through strength” led to the end of the Cold War and the ultimate demise of the Soviet Union, guaranteeing basic human rights for millions of people; and

February 6, 2005, will be the ninety-fourth anniversary of Ronald Reagan’s birth, and the first since his passing.

February 6 of each year is designated “Ronald Reagan Day” in Georgia.

History.

Code 1981, §

1-4-15.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 139, § 1/HB 713; Ga. L. 2007, p. 47, § 1/SB 103.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2006, Code Section 1-4-15, as enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 139, § 1/HB 713, was redesignated as Code Section 1-4-15.1.

1-4-16.
Designation of “Prison Chaplains Appreciation Day.”

The fourth Monday in March of each year is designated and shall be observed as “Prison Chaplains Appreciation Day” in all state and private correctional institutions in Georgia.

History.

Code 1981, §

1-4-16

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 484, § 1/HB 1292.

1-4-17.
Declaration of “Georgia Day.”

The twelfth day of February in each year is declared to be “Georgia Day,” as the anniversary of the landing of the first colonists in Georgia under Oglethorpe.

History.

Code 1981, §

1-4-17

, enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 2, § 1/HB 387.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section formerly pertained to the designation of the year of the museum. The former Code section was based on Code 1981, §

1-4-17

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 720, § 1/SB 195.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2006, Code Section 1-4-16, as enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 720, § 1, was redesignated as Code Section 1-4-17.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2008, Code Section 1-4-17, as enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 563, § 2, was redesignated as Code Section 1-4-18, and Code Section 1-4-17, as enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 566, § 2, was redesignated as Code Section 1-4-19.

1-4-18.
Designation of “School Bus Drivers Appreciation Day.”

The third Monday in October of every year is designated “School Bus Drivers Appreciation Day” in Georgia.

History.

Code 1981, §

1-4-18

, enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 563, § 2/HB 791.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2008, Code Section 1-4-17, as enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 563, § 2, was redesignated as Code Section 1-4-18.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 563, § 1/HB 791, not codified by the General Assembly, provided legislative findings related to the enactment of this Code section.

1-4-19.
Designation of “School Bus Safety Week.”

The third week in October of every year is designated “School Bus Safety Week” in Georgia.

History.

Code 1981, §

1-4-19

, enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 566, § 2/HB 790.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2008, Code Section 1-4-17, as enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 566, § 2, was redesignated as Code Section 1-4-19.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 566, § 1/HB 790, not codified by the General Assembly, provided legislative findings related to the enactment of this Code section.

1-4-20.
Designation of Confederate History and Heritage Month.

The General Assembly hereby finds and determines that tourism is a great economic resource in Georgia; and historical, heritage, and cultural inheritance are among the tourism industry’s most popular attractions. Georgia’s Confederate heritage, physical artifacts and battle sites, and historic events and persons not only attract visitors, they are potentially of even greater importance and benefit to our state’s economy. Increased development of our state’s Confederate history and heritage as part of the tourism industry will be enhanced through recognizing, celebrating, and advertising that heritage and history.

The month of April of each year is hereby designated as Confederate History and Heritage Month and shall be set aside to honor, observe, and celebrate the Confederate States of America, its history, those who served in its armed forces and government, and all those millions of its citizens of various races and ethnic groups and religions who contributed in sundry and myriad ways to the cause which they held so dear from its founding on February 4, 1861, in Montgomery, Alabama, until the Confederate ship CSS Shenandoah sailed into Liverpool Harbor and surrendered to British authorities on November 6, 1865.

Officials and departments of state, county, and municipal governments, boards of education, elementary and secondary schools, colleges and universities, businesses, and all citizens are encouraged to participate in programs, displays, and activities that commemorate and honor our shared history and cultural inheritance throughout each April during Confederate History and Heritage Month.

History.

Code 1981, §

1-4-20

, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 207, § 2/SB 27.

Cross references.

Official Georgia Historical Civil Rights Museum, §

50-3-85

.

1-4-21.
Designation of “Purple Heart Day.”

August 7 of every year is designated as “Purple Heart Day.”

The Governor may annually issue a proclamation designating August 7 as “Purple Heart Day.” Public officials, schools, private organizations, and all residents of this state are encouraged to commemorate Purple Heart Day and honor those wounded or killed while serving in any branch of the United States Armed Services.

History.

Code 1981, §

1-4-21

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 758, § 1/SB 276.

Cross references.

License plates for veterans awarded Purple Heart, §

40-2-84

.

Purple Heart state designation, §

50-3-86

.

1-4-22.
Designation of “Water Professionals Appreciation Day.”

The first Monday in May of each year is designated as “Water Professionals Appreciation Day” in Georgia.

History.

Code 1981, §

1-4-22

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 108, § 2/SB 119.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 108, § 1/SB119, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The General Assembly finds that:

“(1) The Georgia Water Quality Control Act was passed by the Georgia General Assembly and signed into law in 1964 by Governor Carl Sanders;

“(2)
At that time, there were 25 communities in Georgia which had no public sewer systems, 40 communities with a sewer system but no treatment facilities, 60 communities with a sewer system but only primary treatment facilities, 50 communities with a sewer system and secondary treatment facilities which were in need of improvement, and 395 industries which had documented untreated or inadequately treated discharges to Georgia’s surface waters;

“(3)
At the time of passage of the Act, many of Georgia’s surface waters were extremely polluted, and serious water quality problems existed all over the State of Georgia;

“(4)
The state established the Georgia Water Quality Control Board (later reconstituted as the Georgia Environmental Protection Division as a result of the 1972 Reorganization of State Government under Governor Jimmy Carter), and Governor Sanders appointed R.S. ‘Rock’ Howard to be the board’s executive secretary;

“(5) By the time the Federal Water Quality Control Act was passed in 1972, most of Georgia’s industries had been brought into compliance with the initial requirements of the federal Act;

“(6) Over the ensuing four decades, billions of federal, state, and local dollars have been invested in planning, designing, and constructing modern publicly owned wastewater treatment facilities throughout this state;

“(7)
Georgia’s water professionals are committed to operating these facilities to maintain consistent compliance with extremely stringent standards;

“(8)
Both publicly and privately owned facilities have performed so well that they are no longer the most significant threat to Georgia’s waters;

“(9)
The quality of Georgia’s waters has improved dramatically throughout this great state over the years since the passage of the original Act;

“(10)
It is imperative that these improvements be sustained while continuing our efforts to educate Georgians of their growing responsibility in the reduction of non-point sources of pollution to Georgia’s waters;

“(11)
The success that we have experienced thus far and the success that we will have is due to the tremendous dedication and efforts of Georgia’s water professionals; and

“(12)
It is fitting and proper that these individuals and their efforts be appropriately recognized.”

1-4-23.
Designation of “Childhood Cancer Awareness Day.”

September 1 of each year is designated as “Childhood Cancer Awareness Day” in Georgia.

History.

Code 1981, §

1-4-23

, enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 752, § 2/SB 340.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective January 1, 2021.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2020, p. 752, § 1/SB 340, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The General Assembly finds that:

“(1) Childhood cancer is the number one cause of death by disease among children under the age of 19 years;

“(2) Two-thirds of children with cancer will develop a lifelong condition as a result of treatment, and with 12 types and over 100 subtypes of pediatric cancer, 46 children are diagnosed and seven lose their lives every day;

“(3) There are 70 potential life years lost on average when a child dies of cancer compared to 15 potential life years lost for adults;

“(4) Pediatric cancer occurs regularly and randomly among children, sparing no ethnic group, socioeconomic class, or geographic region; and

“(5) Those working in the field of pediatric oncology demonstrate great compassion, understanding, and kindness for the children in their care, and their dedication and commitment to the betterment of the world is appreciated and acknowledged.”

1-4-24.
Designation of “National Swearing-in Commitment Day.”

The second Wednesday of February of each year is designated as “National Swearing-in Commitment Day” in Georgia.

History.

Code 1981, §

1-4-24

, enacted by Ga. L. 2021, p. 204, § 2/HB 208.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2021.

Cross references.

Enlisted personnel, §

38-2-230

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2021, p. 204, § 1/HB 208, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)
Since 1916, the Junior Reserve Officers’ Training Corps (JROTC) has allowed young men and women to experience a sample of military life. Members of JROTC are able to familiarize themselves with the traditions, activities, and morals of the military and seek out potential careers;

“(2)
Most of the activities in JROTC are awarded, sometimes publicly, at various ceremonies, banquets, and other events. Rewarding success serves to motivate some and move them toward a career in the military;

“(3)
Likewise, colleges and universities reward athletes at the high school level with scholarships.
Moreover, many athletes are recognized on signing days.
Some signing days are attended by a large number of students, faculty, staff, and the community.
The hard work and education of the athletes does not go unrecognized.
Those who intend to join and start a career defending the nation should be acknowledged and supported on local, state, and national levels; and

“(4)
Putting such a day in place would build unity and support for all components (Army, Navy, Marines, Coast Guard, Air Force, Army National Guard, Air National Guard, and Merchant Marines) of our national defense.”

1-4-25.
Designation of “Public Safety Week.”

The week in September during which September 11 falls every year is designated “Public Safety Week” in Georgia.

History.

Code 1981, §

1-4-25

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 73, § 2/HB 1335.

Effective date.

This Code section became effective April 4, 2022.

Cross references.

Department of Public Safety, T. 35, C. 2.